Vermont statutes. Title 5 Aeronautics and Surface Transportation Generally
Subchapter 3. Accidents and Liability for Injury

§ 476.
Reports of accidents.

The operator of an aircraft involved in an accident or incident on a State-owned airport resulting in personal injury or damage to property shall immediately notify the Agency and within 48 hours shall make a report to the Agency of the circumstances of the accident. The report shall state as accurately as possible the time, place, and cause of the accident, the injuries, and whatever other information the Agency may require. For purposes of this subsection, “accident” means an occurrence associated with the operation of an aircraft which takes place between the time any person boards the aircraft with the intention of flight and all such persons have disembarked, and in which any person suffers death or injury, or in which the aircraft or personal property owned by any person is damaged, and “incident” means an occurrence other than an accident associated with the operation of an aircraft which affects or could affect the safety of operations.

The operator of an aircraft involved in an accident or incident, other than on a State-owned airport, that requires reporting to the National Transportation Safety Board under federal law shall immediately notify the Agency and within 48 hours shall make a report to the Agency of the circumstances of the accident. The report shall contain the same information as a report for an accident occurring on a State-owned airport. For purposes of this subsection, “accident” and “incident” shall have the same meaning as in 49 C.F.R. § 830.5.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1997, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 477.
Removal of wrecks.

No aircraft or part of an aircraft involved in an accident in this State resulting in serious or fatal injuries or in such damage as to render the aircraft not airworthy shall be moved or disturbed except when:

necessary to give assistance to persons injured or trapped in the wreckage;

necessary in the interest of public safety;

specific permission has been granted by an authorized representative of the Agency;

prompt movement of the aircraft is necessary to protect it from further serious damage and it is impossible to communicate with any person authorized in subdivision (3) of this section to direct the removal of the wreckage; or

the aircraft involved in an accident is a public aircraft.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, the operator of the aircraft shall promptly remove it from the accident site after all on-site rescue and investigatory processes are completed.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1997, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 478.
Minimum disturbance in movement; record of original condition.

Any movement of the aircraft or any part of the aircraft under section 477 of this title shall be so accomplished as to result in the minimum possible disturbance of the material concerned.
Prior to movement, a record of the original position and condition of the wreckage shall be made as completely and accurately as possible under the circumstances, unless the danger to public safety is such as to permit no delay, or unless an authorized representative of the Agency has directed otherwise.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 479.
Liability of owner of aircraft for injuries.

The owner of an aircraft which is operated over the lands or waters of this State is liable for injuries to persons or property on the land or water beneath, caused by the ascent, descent, or flight of the aircraft or the dropping or falling of an object from an aircraft, unless the injury is caused in whole or in part by the negligence of the person injured or of the owner or bailee of the property injured.
If the aircraft is leased at the time of the injury to person or property, both owner and lessee shall be liable, and they may be sued jointly, or either or both of them may be sued separately. However, the owner or lessee shall not be responsible when the aircraft causing injury or damage is taken without the knowledge or permission of the owner or lessee.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 480.
Liability of airman not owner or lessee.

An airman who is not the owner or lessee shall be liable for the consequences of his or her own negligence.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 481.
Lien for damages.

The injured person, or owner or bailee of the injured property, shall have a lien on the aircraft causing the injury to the extent of the damages caused by the aircraft or objects falling from it when the owner or lessee is liable for the damages.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 482.
Determination of liability.

The liability of the owner of one aircraft to the owner of another aircraft or to airmen or passengers on either aircraft for damage caused by collision on land or in the air shall be determined by the rules of law applicable to torts on land.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 483.
Penalties.

A person who violates a provision of this chapter, unless some other penalty is specifically provided, shall be fined not more than $500.00 or imprisoned for not more than 90 days, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 484.
Secretary as attorney for service of process.

The acceptance by a person of the rights and privileges conferred upon him or her by this part of this title, as evidenced by his or her operating, or causing to be operated, an aircraft in this State, shall be deemed equivalent to an appointment by the person of the Secretary or his or her successor in office, to be his or her true and lawful attorney upon whom may be served all lawful processes in any action or proceedings against the person growing out of any accident or collision in which the person may be involved while operating or causing to be operated an aircraft in this State.
That acceptance shall be deemed to be the agreement of the person that any process against him or her which is so served upon the Secretary shall be of the same validity as if served on the person personally.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 485.
Service on Secretary; mailing copies; fees.

Service of process under section 484 of this title shall be made by leaving a copy of the process with a fee of $20.00 with the Secretary or in his or her office. That service shall be sufficient service upon the person, provided that a copy of the process with the officer’s return, showing service upon the Secretary as provided in this section, is sent by the plaintiff to the defendant by registered mail, and provided further that the plaintiff’s affidavit of compliance with this section is filed with the process in court. The Secretary shall file copies served upon him or her as provided by this section, and show upon each copy the day and hour of service.

This manner of service shall be in addition to all existing manner of service, rights, and remedies.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 486.
Continuances; costs.

The court in which the action is pending may order such continuances as may be necessary to afford the defendant reasonable opportunity to defend the action.
The fee provided in section 485 of this title shall be taxed in the plaintiff’s costs, if he or she prevails in the suit.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.